en: Piston application type: Diesel performance; Heavy-duty/commercial; Marine use; Motorcycle use; Nitrous-ready; OEM replacement; Off-road/ATV/UTV use; Performance street; Racing; Turbo/supercharged (boosted); Other
sk-SK: Typ aplikácie piestu: Zvýšenie výkonu dieselových motorov; Pre veľké zaťaženie/komerčné; Námorné použitie; Použitie pre motocykle; Pripravené na oxid dusný (nitro); OEM náhrada; Použitie pre off-road/ATV/UTV; Výkonné cestné; Pretekárske; Turbo/preplňované; Iné
ru: Тип применения поршня: Высокопроизводительные дизельные двигатели; Тяжелые условия эксплуатации / коммерческий транспорт; Судовые двигатели; Мотоциклетные двигатели; Совместимы с закисью азота; Замена OEM; Внедорожники / ATV / UTV; Стрит-перформанс; Гоночные; Турбированные / с нагнетателем (форсированные); Другое
de: Verwendungszweck des Kolbens: Diesel Performance; Heavy-Duty/Nutzfahrzeuge; Einsatz im Marinebereich; Einsatz im Motorradbereich; Lachgas-geeignet; OEM-Ersatzteil; Einsatz in Offroad/ATV/UTV; Performance Straße; Rennsport; Turbo/Kompressor (aufgeladen); Andere
ja: ピストン適用タイプ: ディーゼルパフォーマンス; ヘビーデューティー/商用; 船舶用; オートバイ用; ナイトラス対応; OEM交換用; オフロード/ATV/UTV用; パフォーマンスストリート; レーシング; ターボ/スーパーチャージャー (過給機); その他
pt-PT: Tipo de aplicação Piston: Desempenho a diesel; Uso intensivo/comercial; Uso marítimo; Uso em motociclos; Preparado para nitro; Substituição OEM; Todo o terreno/ATV/UTV; Rua com desempenho; Corridas; Turbo/sobrealimentado (com aumento de pressão); Outro
nl: Zuiger toepassingstype: Diesel performance; Heavy-duty/commercieel; Maritiem gebruik; Gebruik voor motorfietsen; Lachgas-ready; OEM-vervanging; Offroad/ATV/UTV-gebruik; Performance street; Racing; Turbo/supercharged; Overig
cs: Typ použití pístu: Výkonné naftové motory; Těžká technika / užitková vozidla; Námořní použití; Použití v motocyklech; Připraveno na oxid dusný (nitrous); Náhrada za OEM; Použití off-road / ATV / UTV; Výkonná silniční auta; Závodní; Přeplňované motory (turbo/kompresor); Ostatní
nb: Brukstype for stempel: Ytelse for diesel; Tungtransport/kommersiell; Maritim bruk; Motorsykkelbruk; Klargjort for lystgass; OEM-erstatning; Terreng/ATV/UTV-bruk; Ytelse for gatebruk; Racing; Turbo/kompressor (overladet); Annet
th: ประเภทการใช้งานลูกสูบ: เครื่องยนต์ดีเซลสมรรถนะสูง; ใช้งานหนัก/เชิงพาณิชย์; สำหรับใช้กับเรือ; สำหรับรถจักรยานยนต์; รองรับระบบไนตรัส; อะไหล่ทดแทน OEM; สำหรับออฟโรด/ATV/UTV; รถถนนสมรรถนะสูง; รถแข่ง; เทอร์โบ/ซูเปอร์ชาร์จ (บูสต์); อื่นๆ
sv: Användningsområde för kolv: Dieselprestanda; Tungt/kommersiellt; För marint bruk; För motorcykelbruk; Lustgasförberedd; OEM-ersättning; Offroad/ATV/UTV-bruk; Gatuprestanda; Racing; Turbo/kompressormatad (överladdad); Övrigt
es: Tipo de aplicación de pistón: Rendimiento diésel; Trabajo pesado/comercial; Uso marino; Uso en motocicletas; Preparado para óxido nitroso; Repuesto OEM; Uso en todoterreno/ATV/UTV; Rendimiento urbano; Carreras; Turbo/sobrealimentado (potenciado); Otro
ro-RO: Tipul de aplicație al pistonului: Performanță diesel; Trafic greu/comercial; Uz marin; Uz pentru motociclete; Pregătit pentru oxid de azot (nitrous); Înlocuire OEM; Uz off-road/ATV/UTV; Performanță stradală; Curse; Turbo/Supraalimentat; Altele
hr-HR: Vrsta primjene klipa: Performance za dizel motore; Za teške uvjete rada / komercijalna vozila; Za pomorsku upotrebu; Za motocikle; Spremno za upotrebu dušikova oksida; Zamjena za OEM; Za terensku upotrebu / ATV / UTV; Ulične performanse; Za utrke; S turbopunjačem / kompresorom; Ostalo
vi: Loại ứng dụng piston: Hiệu suất động cơ diesel; Tải trọng nặng/thương mại; Sử dụng cho hàng hải; Sử dụng cho xe máy; Sẵn sàng cho nitrous; Thay thế OEM; Sử dụng off-road/ATV/UTV; Xe đường phố hiệu suất cao; Đua xe; Turbo/siêu nạp (tăng áp); Khác
pl: Typ zastosowania tłoka: Wydajne silniki Diesla; Ciężarowe/komercyjne; Morskie; Motocyklowe; Przystosowane do podtlenku azotu; Zamienniki OEM; Off-road / ATV / UTV; Wydajne uliczne; Wyścigowe; Z turbodoładowaniem / kompresorem; Inny
bg-BG: Тип приложение на буталото: Дизел, висока ефективност; Тежкотоварни/търговски; За морски съдове; За мотоциклети; За системи с азотен оксид; ОЕМ резервни части; За офроуд/ATV/UTV; Високоефективни за градски условия; Състезателни; С турбо/суперчарджър (усилени); Друго
ko: 피스톤 적용 유형: 디젤 퍼포먼스; 대형/상업용; 해양용; 오토바이용; 나이트로스 지원; OEM 교체; 오프로드/ATV/UTV용; 퍼포먼스 스트리트; 레이싱; 터보/슈퍼차저(부스트); 기타
tr: Piston kullanım tipi: Dizel performans; Ağır hizmet/ticari; Denizcilik kullanımı; Motosiklet kullanımı; Nitroz uyumlu; OEM değişimi; Arazi/ATV/UTV kullanımı; Performans sokak; Yarış; Turbo/süperşarjlı (takviyeli); Diğer
el: Τύπος εφαρμογής εμβόλου: Απόδοσης ντίζελ; Βαρέως τύπου/επαγγελματική; Ναυτιλιακή χρήση; Χρήση σε μοτοσικλέτα; Συμβατό με νίτρο; Ανταλλακτικό OEM; Χρήση εκτός δρόμου/ATV/UTV; Απόδοσης για δρόμο; Αγώνων; Turbo/υπερτροφοδοτούμενο; Άλλο
pt-BR: Pistão aplicação tipo: Desempenho a diesel; Uso pesado/comercial; Uso marítimo; Uso em motocicletas; Preparado para nitro; Reposição original (OEM); Uso em off-road/ATV/UTV; Desempenho de rua; Corrida; Turbo/superalimentado (turbinado); Outros
sl-SI: Vrsta uporabe bata: Zmogljivostni dizel; Težka mehanizacija/komercialna vozila; Za plovila; Za motorna kolesa; Za sisteme z dušikovim oksidom; Nadomestni deli OEM; Za terenska vozila/ATV/UTV; Zmogljivostna cestna vozila; Dirkanje; S turbopolnilnikom/kompresorjem (prisilno polnjeno); Drugo
zh-CN: 活塞应用类型: 柴油机高性能; 重型/商用; 船用; 摩托车用; 适配氮气加速; OEM 替换件; 越野/ATV/UTV 用; 高性能街道版; 赛车竞速; 涡轮/机械增压; 其他
fi: Männän käyttökohde: Suorituskykyinen diesel; Raskas kalusto / kaupallinen; Merikäyttö; Moottoripyöräkäyttö; Iloekaasuvalmius; OEM-korvaus; Maasto-/ATV-/UTV-käyttö; Suorituskykyinen katuajoneuvo; Kilpa-ajo; Turbo/ahdettu; Muu
fr: Type d’usage du piston: Performance diesel; Usage intensif/commercial; Usage marin; Usage moto; Prêt pour protoxyde d'azote; Pièce de rechange OEM; Usage hors route/VTT/UTV; Performance de rue; Course; Turbo/surcompressé (suralimenté); Autre
zh-TW: 活塞應用類型: 柴油性能車; 重型/商用車; 航海用; 摩托車用; 適用氮氣系統; OEM 替換零件; 越野/ATV/UTV 用; 高性能街車; 賽車; 渦輪/機械增壓 (增壓); 其他
da: Stempels anvendelsestype: Diesel performance; Heavy-duty/erhverv; Maritimt brug; Motorcykelbrug; Klar til lattergas; OEM-reservedel; Offroad-/ATV-/UTV-brug; Performance til gadebrug; Racerløb; Turbo/kompressor (boostet); Andet
hu: Dugattyúalkalmazás típusa: Nagyteljesítményű dízel; Nagy igénybevétel/kereskedelmi; Tengeri használat; Motorkerékpár; Nitró-kompatibilis; Gyári (OEM) csere; Off-road/ATV/UTV; Nagyteljesítményű utcai; Verseny; Turbó/kompresszoros (feltöltött); Egyéb
lt-LT: Stūmoklio paskirties tipas: Padidinto našumo dyzelinis; Sustiprintas / komercinis; Jūrinis; Motociklams; Pritaikyta azoto suboksidui; OEM pakaitalas; Bekelei / keturračiams / UTV; Gatvės (padidinto našumo); Lenktyninis; Turbo / kompresorinis (su pripūtimu); Kita
it: Tipo di applicazione del pistone: Prestazioni diesel; Uso intensivo/commerciale; Uso marino; Uso motociclistico; Predisposto per protossido d'azoto; Ricambio OEM; Uso fuoristrada/ATV/UTV; Prestazioni stradali; Racing; Turbo/supercharged (boosted); Altro